New York, session 2025-2026, A89.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 3 of the public officers law, as 2 amended by chapter 1004 of the laws of 1966, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. [Neither] In a city with a population less than one million, 5 neither the provisions of this section or of any general, special or 6 local law, charter, code, ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation, 7 requiring a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or 8 municipal corporation of the state for which [he] such person shall be 9 chosen or within which [his] their official functions are required to be 10 exercised, shall apply to the appointment of a person as a member of the 11 police force of any political subdivision or municipal corporation of 12 the state if such person resides (a) in the county in which such poli- 13 tical subdivision or municipal corporation is located; or (b) in a coun- 14 ty within the state contiguous to the county in which such political 15 subdivision or municipal corporation is located; or (c) in a county 16 within the state contiguous to such political subdivision or municipal 17 corporation; or (d) in a county within the state contiguous to a county 18 described in item (c) hereof where the former is less than fifteen miles 19 from such political subdivision or municipal corporation, measured from 20 their respective nearest boundary lines; or (e) in a county within the 21 state contiguous to a county described in item (d) hereof where the 22 former is less than thirty miles from such political subdivision or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00778-01-5 A. 89 2 1 municipal corporation, measured from their respective nearest boundary 2 lines. 3 § 2. Subdivision 19 of section 3 of the public officers law, as added 4 by chapter 509 of the laws of 1986, is amended to read as follows: 5 19. Any person who resides in this state and who is currently employed 6 as [a member of the police force,] a paid member of the uniformed force 7 of a paid fire department or department of corrections in the correc- 8 tional service classification of the classified civil service, of a city 9 of over one million population, shall be exempt from the provisions of 10 subdivisions one, two and nine of this section upon compliance with the 11 procedure set forth in this subdivision. Any person seeking to benefit 12 from the exemption created by this subdivision shall notify [his] their 13 respective employer in writing of said intention within thirty days from 14 the effective date of this subdivision and shall specify [his] their 15 then current residence address. The exemption created by this subdivi- 16 sion shall be applicable only to said actual designated residence and 17 not to any residence that any subject currently employed member may 18 thereafter establish; provided, however, that any such currently 19 employed member who resides outside this state shall have one year from 20 the effective date of this subdivision within which to establish resi- 21 dence as required pursuant to subdivisions one, two and nine of this 22 section and comply with the notice requirements of this subdivision. 23 Said residence shall constitute a lawful residence for all purposes 24 notwithstanding any provision to the contrary of any general, special or 25 local law, charter, code, ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation. 26 § 3. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 27 subdivision 19-a to read as follows: 28 19-a. In a city with a population of one million or more, any person 29 appointed as a paid member of the police force of such city shall become 30 a resident of any political subdivision or municipal corporation within 31 such city within one year of such person's appointment and shall contin- 32 ue to reside within any such political subdivision or municipal corpo- 33 ration. No person appointed as a paid member of such police force may 34 continue such employment unless such person complies with the provisions 35 of this subdivision. 36 § 4. Paragraph 1 of subdivision 4 of section 30 of the public officers 37 law, as amended by chapter 173 of the laws of 1962, is amended to read 38 as follows: 39 (1) If such person was appointed as a member of such police force 40 prior to [July first, nineteen hundred sixty-one] January first, two 41 thousand twenty-six, shall reside in any such county on such date and 42 shall continue to reside in any such county after such date, or 43 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.